Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.812

Prenatal substance exposure—Expanded treatment and services.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority shall expand specific treatment and services to children and youth with prenatal substance exposure who would benefit from evidence-based services impacting their behavioral and physical health.

(2) The authority shall contract for the services authorized in this section with behavioral health entities in a manner that allows leveraging of federal medicaid funds to pay for a portion of the costs.

(3) The authority shall consult with the department of children, youth, and families in the implementation of the program and services authorized under this section.

[ 2024 c 328 s 203.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 328: See note following RCW 13.34.050.